Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,287
Television set; equipping motor vehicle with screen visible to driver; unlawful; penalty.

It shall be unlawful to operate upon any public highway in this state a motor vehicle which is equipped with or in which is located a television set so placed that the viewing screen is visible to the driver while operating such vehicle. Any person violating this section shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1951, c. 113, § 1, p. 522;

R.R.S.1943, § 39-7,123.01;

Laws 1977, LB 41, § 29;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,169;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 383.